Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 3. Liability of Innkeepers

§ 3141.
Liability for loss.

If an innkeeper or hotel keeper provides a safe in his or her inn or hotel for the safekeeping of money, jewelry, and valuable papers and articles belonging to the guests of such inn or hotel and gives notice thereof by posting in a conspicuous place in the office and public parlors of such inn or hotel the fact that such safe is provided in which such property may be deposited, and a guest neglects to deliver or deposit therein any such property to the person apparently in charge of the office, such innkeeper or hotel keeper shall not be liable for the loss of any such property sustained by such guests, unless such loss occurs through want of ordinary care and diligence of such innkeeper or hotel keeper.

§ 3142.
Limitation on liability.

No recovery in excess of $300.00 for loss of personal property shall be had by the guest of an hotel or inn, unless at the time of becoming such guest notice is given by such guest to the proprietor of such hotel or inn that the value of the property deposited by such guest is in excess of the sum of $300.00 with a statement of the value of such property and an offer to pay whatever sum may be required by such proprietor as compensation for the care of such property so deposited.

§ 3143.
Loss of samples, apparel, baggage; loss by fire or force.

An innkeeper or hotel keeper shall not be liable for loss of or damage to articles known or used as “samples,” unless such loss occurs through want of ordinary care and diligence of such innkeeper or hotel keeper.

An innkeeper or hotel keeper shall not be liable to a guest for the loss of wearing apparel or personal baggage unless such loss occurs through want of ordinary care and diligence of such innkeeper or hotel keeper.

An innkeeper or hotel keeper shall not be liable for loss in case of fire or overwhelming force where such innkeeper or hotel keeper has exercised ordinary and reasonable care in the custody of the baggage or other property of the guest.